California statutes. Penal Code
(a) (1) The Department of Corrections shall establish three pilot programs that provide intensive training and counseling programs for female parolees to assist in the successful reintegration of those parolees into the community upon release or discharge from prison and after completion of in-prison therapeutic community substance abuse treatment programs.

(2) The Director of Corrections shall determine the counties in which the pilot programs are
 established.

(b) (1) The services offered in the pilot programs may include, but shall not be limited to, drug and alcohol abuse treatment, cognitive skills development, education, life skills, job skills, victim impact awareness, anger management, family reunification, counseling, vocational training and support, residential care, and placement in affordable housing and employment opportunities.

(2) Ancillary services such as child care and reimbursement of transportation costs shall be provided to the extent necessary to permit full participation by female offenders in employment assistance, substance abuse treatment, and other program elements.

(3) The pilot programs shall include a case management component to assess the social services and other needs of participating in the social
 services, education, job training, and other programs most likely to result in their recovery and employment success.

(c) With respect to a female parolee who violates her parole, the Board of Prison Terms may order initial or continued participation in a program under this section, in lieu of revocation pursuant to Section 3060, provided the department approves the program participation, the parolee meets all eligibility criteria for the program, and the parole violation was nonviolent.

(d) (1) The Department of Corrections shall prepare an informational handout explaining the pilot programs created by this section.

(2) A copy of this informational handout shall be given to each female inmate eligible for any of the pilot programs and to each female parolee eligible for any of the pilot
 programs pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) Subject to appropriation of funds, the department is authorized to enter into contracts, or amend existing contracts, for community residential treatment services for offenders and minor children in an offender’s custody in order to carry out the goals stated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(f) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the programs demonstrate the cost-effectiveness of providing the enhanced services described in subdivision (b), based upon an annual evaluation of a representative sample of female parolees, in order to determine the impact of these services upon the criminal recidivism, employment, and welfare dependency of the offenders and their families.

(2) The department, with the assistance of an independent consultant with
 expertise in criminal justice programs, shall complete a report evaluating the cost-effectiveness of the pilot programs in regard to the effect of the programs (A) on the recidivism of participating female offenders compared with a comparable nonparticipating group of female offenders and (B) on the employment of female offenders and the welfare dependency of a female offender’s family. The report shall be provided to the Governor and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature by January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3055.

(a) The Elderly Parole Program is hereby established, to be administered by the Board of Parole Hearings, for purposes of reviewing the parole suitability of any inmate who is 50 years of age or older and has served a minimum of 20 years of continuous incarceration on the inmate’s current sentence, serving either a determinate or indeterminate sentence.

(b) (1) For purposes of this code, the term “elderly parole eligible date” means the date on which an inmate who qualifies as an elderly offender is eligible for release from prison.

(2) For purposes of this section, “incarceration” means detention in a city or county jail, local juvenile facility, a mental health facility, a
 Division of Juvenile Justice facility, or a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation facility.

(c) When considering the release of an inmate specified by subdivision (a) pursuant to Section 3041, the board shall give special consideration to whether age, time served, and diminished physical condition, if any, have reduced the elderly inmate’s risk for future violence.

(d) When scheduling a parole consideration hearing date pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3041.5 or when considering a request for an advance hearing pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3041.5, the board shall consider whether the inmate meets or will meet the criteria specified in subdivision (a).

(e) An individual who is subject to this section shall meet with the board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3041. If an inmate is found suitable for parole under the Elderly Parole Program, the board shall release the individual on parole as provided in Section 3041.

(f) If parole is not granted, the board shall set the time for a subsequent elderly parole hearing in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 3041.5. No subsequent elderly parole hearing shall be necessary if the offender is released pursuant to other statutory provisions prior to the date of the subsequent hearing.

(g) This section does not apply to cases in which sentencing occurs pursuant to Section 1170.12, subdivisions (b) to (i), inclusive, of Section 667, or in cases which an individual was sentenced to life in prison
 without the possibility of parole or death.

(h) This section does not apply if the person was convicted of first-degree murder if the victim was a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1, 830.2, 830.3, 830.31, 830.32, 830.33, 830.34, 830.35, 830.36, 830.37, 830.4, 830.5, 830.6, 830.10, 830.11, or 830.12, who was killed while engaged in the performance of their duties, and the individual knew, or reasonably should have known, that the victim was a peace officer engaged in the performance of their duties, or the victim was a peace officer or a former peace officer under any of the above-enumerated sections, and was intentionally killed in retaliation for the performance of their official duties.

(i) This section does not alter the rights of victims at parole hearings.

(j) By December 31, 2022, the board shall
 complete all elderly parole hearings for individuals who were sentenced to determinate or indeterminate terms and who, on the effective date of the bill that added this subdivision, are or will be entitled to have their parole suitability considered at an elderly parole hearing before January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 15.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3056.

(a) Prisoners on parole shall remain under the supervision of the department but shall not be returned to prison except as provided in subdivision (b) or as provided by subdivision (c) of Section 3000.09. A parolee awaiting a parole revocation hearing may be housed in a county jail while awaiting revocation proceedings. If a parolee is housed in a county jail, they shall be housed in the county in which they were arrested or the county in which a petition to revoke parole has been filed or, if there is no county jail in that county, in the housing facility with which that county has contracted to house jail inmates. Additionally, except as provided by subdivision (c) of Section 3000.09, upon revocation of parole, a parolee may be housed in a county jail for a maximum of 180 days per revocation. When housed in county facilities,
 parolees shall be under the sole legal custody and jurisdiction of local county facilities. A parolee shall remain under the sole legal custody and jurisdiction of the local county or local correctional administrator, even if placed in an alternative custody program in lieu of incarceration, including, but not limited to, work furlough and electronic home detention. When a parolee is under the legal custody and jurisdiction of a county facility awaiting parole revocation proceedings or upon revocation, the parolee shall not be under the parole supervision or jurisdiction of the department. Unless otherwise serving a period of flash incarceration, whenever a parolee who is subject to this section has been arrested, with or without a warrant or the filing of a petition for revocation with the court, the court may order the release of the parolee from custody under any terms and conditions the court deems appropriate. When released from the county facility or county alternative custody program following a
 period of custody for revocation of parole or because no violation of parole is found, the parolee shall be returned to the parole supervision of the department for the duration of parole.

(b) Inmates paroled pursuant to Section 3000.1 may be returned to prison following the revocation of parole by the Board of Parole Hearings until July 1, 2013, and thereafter by a court pursuant to Section 3000.08.

(c) Until July 1, 2021, a parolee who is subject to subdivision (a), but who is under 18 years of age, may be housed in a facility of the Division of Juvenile Justice, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3057.

(a) Confinement pursuant to a revocation of parole in the absence of a new conviction and commitment to prison under other provisions of law, shall not exceed 12 months, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) Upon completion of confinement pursuant to parole revocation without a new commitment to prison, the inmate shall be released on parole for a period that shall not extend beyond that portion of the maximum statutory period of parole specified by Section 3000 which was unexpired at the time of each revocation.

(c) Notwithstanding the limitations in subdivision (a) and in Section 3060.5 upon confinement pursuant to a parole revocation, the parole authority may extend the confinement pursuant to
 parole revocation for a maximum of an additional 12 months for subsequent acts of misconduct committed by the parolee while confined pursuant to that parole revocation. Upon a finding of good cause to believe that a parolee has committed a subsequent act of misconduct and utilizing procedures governing parole revocation proceedings, the parole authority may extend the period of confinement pursuant to parole revocation as follows: (1) not more than 180 days for an act punishable as a felony, whether or not prosecution is undertaken, (2) not more than 90 days for an act punishable as a misdemeanor, whether or not prosecution is undertaken, and (3) not more than 30 days for an act defined as a serious disciplinary offense pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2932.

(d) (1) Except for parolees specified in paragraph (2), any revocation period imposed under subdivision (a) may be reduced in the same manner and to the same
 extent as a term of imprisonment may be reduced by worktime credits under Section 2933. Worktime credit shall be earned and may be forfeited pursuant to the provisions of Section 2932.

Worktime credit forfeited shall not be restored.

(2) The following parolees shall not be eligible for credit under this subdivision:

(A) Parolees who are sentenced under Section 1168 with a maximum term of life imprisonment.

(B) Parolees who violated a condition of parole relating to association with specified persons, entering prohibited areas, attendance at parole outpatient clinics, or psychiatric attention.

(C) Parolees who were revoked for conduct described in, or that could be prosecuted under any of the following sections,
 whether or not prosecution is undertaken: Section 189, Section 191.5, subdivision (a) of Section 192, subdivision (a) of Section 192.5, Section 203, 207, 211, 215, 217.1, or 220, subdivision (b) of Section 241, Section 244, paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 245, paragraph (2) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262, Section 264.1, subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 286, subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 287 or of former Section 288a, Section 288, subdivision (a) of Section 289, 347, or 404, subdivision (a) of Section 451, Section 12022, 12022.5, 12022.53, 12022.7, 12022.8, or 25400, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6, any provision listed in Section 16590, or Section 664 for any attempt to engage in conduct described in or that could be prosecuted under any of the above-mentioned sections.

(D) Parolees who were revoked for
 any reason if they had been granted parole after conviction of any of the offenses specified in subparagraph (C).

(E) Parolees who the parole authority finds at a revocation hearing to be unsuitable for reduction of the period of confinement because of the circumstances and gravity of the parole violation, or because of prior criminal history.

(e) Commencing October 1, 2011, this section shall only apply to inmates sentenced to a term of life imprisonment or parolees that on or before September 30, 2011, are pending a final adjudication of a parole revocation charge and subject to subdivision (c) of Section 3000.09.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 61.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.

Any person who knowingly and wilfully communicates to another, either orally or in writing, any statement concerning any person then or theretofore convicted of a felony, and then on parole, and which communication is made with the purpose and intent to deprive said person so convicted of employment, or to prevent him from procuring the same, or with the purpose and intent to extort from him any money or article of value; and any person who threatens to make any said communication with the purpose and intent to extort money or any article of value from said person so convicted of a felony, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.4.

(a) All parole officers shall report to the appropriate child protective agency if a person paroled following a conviction of Section 273a, 273ab, or 273d, or any sex offense identified in statute as being perpetrated against a minor, has violated the terms or conditions of parole related specifically to restrictions on contact with the victim or the victim’s family.

(b) The Department of Corrections shall annually provide to all parole officers a written summary describing the
 legal duties of parole officers to report information to local child protective agencies as required by Section 11166 and this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 957, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.5.

The Department of Corrections shall provide within 10 days, upon request, to the chief of police of a city or the sheriff of a county, information available to the department, including actual, glossy photographs, no smaller than 318 x 318 inches in size, and, in conjunction with the Department of Justice, fingerprints, concerning persons then on parole who are or may be residing or temporarily domiciled in that city or county.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 196, Sec. 2) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.6.

(a) Whenever any person confined to state prison is serving a term for the conviction of a violent felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, with respect to inmates sentenced pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1168 or pursuant to Section 1170, shall notify the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, who has jurisdiction over the community in which the person
 was convicted and, in addition, the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, having jurisdiction over the community in which the person is scheduled to be released on parole or rereleased following a period of confinement pursuant to a parole revocation without a new commitment.

(b) (1) The notification shall be made by mail at least 60 days prior to the scheduled release date, except as provided in paragraph (3). In all cases, the notification shall include the name of the person who is scheduled to be released, whether or not the person is required to register with local law enforcement, and the community in which the person will reside. The notification shall specify the office within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation with the authority to make final determination and adjustments regarding parole location decisions.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not restore credits nor take any administrative action resulting in an inmate being placed in a greater credit earning category that would result in notification being provided less than 60 days prior to an inmate’s scheduled release date.

(3) When notification cannot be provided at least 60 days prior to release due to the unanticipated release date change of an inmate as a result of an order from the court, an action by the Board of Parole Hearings, the granting of an administrative appeal, or a finding of not guilty or dismissal of a disciplinary action, that affects the sentence of the inmate, or due to a modification of the department’s decision regarding the community into which the person is scheduled to be released pursuant to paragraph (4), the department shall provide notification as soon as practicable, but in no case
 shall the department delay making the notification more than 24 hours from the time the final decision is made regarding where the parolee will be released.

(4) Those agencies receiving the notice referred to in this subdivision may provide written comment to the board or department regarding the impending release. Agencies that choose to provide written comments shall respond within 45 days prior to the inmate’s scheduled release, unless an agency received less than 60 days’ notice of the impending release, in which case the agency shall respond as soon as practicable prior to the scheduled release. Those comments shall be considered by the board or department which may, based on those comments, modify its decision regarding the community in which the person is scheduled to be released. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall respond in writing not less than 15 days prior to the scheduled release with a final determination as to
 whether to adjust the parole location and documenting the basis for its decision, unless the department received comments less than 45 days prior to the impending release, in which case the department shall respond as soon as practicable and prior to the scheduled release. The comments shall become a part of the inmate’s file.

(c) If the court orders the immediate release of an inmate, the department shall notify the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, having jurisdiction over the community in which the person was convicted and, in addition, the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, having jurisdiction over the community in which the person is scheduled to be released on parole at the time of release.

(d) (1) The notification required by this section shall be made whether or not a request has been made
 under Section 3058.5.

(2) In no case shall notice required by this section to the appropriate agency be later than the day of release on parole. If, after the 60-day notice is given to law enforcement and to the district attorney relating to an out-of-county placement, there is a change of county placement, notice to the ultimate county of placement shall be made upon the determination of the county of placement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 16.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.61.

Whenever any person confined to state prison is serving a term for a conviction of Section 646.9, the Department of Corrections shall notify by mail, at least 45 days prior to the person’s scheduled release date, the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney who has jurisdiction over the community in which the person was convicted, and the sheriff, chief of police, or both, and the district attorney having jurisdiction over the community in which the person is scheduled to be released on parole, or released following a period of confinement
 pursuant to a parole revocation without a new commitment. The notification shall indicate whether the victim has requested notification from the department pursuant to Section 646.92.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 561, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.65.

(a) (1) Whenever any person confined in the state prison is serving a term for the conviction of child abuse, pursuant to Section 273a, 273ab, 273d, any sex offense specified as being perpetrated against a minor, or an act of domestic violence, or as ordered by a court, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, with respect to inmates sentenced pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1168 or pursuant to Section 1170, shall notify the following parties that the person is scheduled to be released on parole, or rereleased following a period of confinement pursuant to a parole revocation without a new commitment, as specified in subdivision (b):

(A) The immediate family of the parolee who requests notification and provides the department
 with a current address.

(B) A county child welfare services agency that requests notification pursuant to Section 16507 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) For the purposes of this paragraph, “immediate family of the parolee” means the parents, siblings, and spouse of the parolee.

(b) (1) The notification shall be made by mail at least 60 days prior to the scheduled release date, except as provided in paragraph (2). In all cases, the notification shall include the name of the person who is scheduled to be released, the terms of that person’s parole, whether or not that person is required to register with local law enforcement, and the community in which that person will reside. The notification shall specify the office within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation that has the
 authority to make the final determination and adjustments regarding parole location decisions.

(2) When notification cannot be provided within the 60 days due to the unanticipated release date change of an inmate as a result of an order from the court, an action by the Board of Parole Hearings, the granting of an administrative appeal, or a finding of not guilty or dismissal of a disciplinary action, that affects the sentence of the inmate, or due to a modification of the department’s decision regarding the community into which the person is scheduled to be released pursuant to paragraph (3), the department shall provide notification to the parties and agencies specified in subdivision (a) as soon as practicable, but in no case less than 24 hours after the final decision is made regarding the location where the parolee will be released.

(3) Those agencies receiving the notice
 referred to in this subdivision may provide written comment to the board or department regarding the impending release. Agencies that choose to provide written comments shall respond within 30 days prior to the inmate’s scheduled release, unless an agency received less than 60 days’ notice of the impending release, in which case the agency shall respond as soon as practicable prior to the scheduled release. Those comments shall be considered by the board or department which may, based on those comments, modify its decision regarding the community in which the person is scheduled to be released. The board or department shall respond in writing not less than 15 days prior to the scheduled release with a final determination as to whether to adjust the parole location and documenting the basis for its decision, unless the department received comments less than 30 days prior to the impending release, in which case the department shall respond as soon as practicable prior to the scheduled release. The comments
 shall become a part of the inmate’s file.

(c) In no case shall the notice required by this section be later than the day the person is released on parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 495, Sec. 10.   (SB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.7.

(a) Whenever any sheriff or chief of police is notified of the pending release of a convicted violent felon pursuant to Section 3058.6, that sheriff or chief of police may notify any person designated by the sheriff or chief of police as an appropriate recipient of this notice.

(b) A law enforcement official authorized to provide notice pursuant to this section, and the public agency or entity employing the law enforcement official, shall not be liable for providing or failing to
 provide notice pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.8.

(a) At the time a notification is sent pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3058.6, the Board of Parole Hearings or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the designated agency responsible for notification, as the case may be, shall also notify persons described in Section 679.03 who have requested a notice informing those persons of the fact that the person who committed the violent
 offense is scheduled to be released from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or from the State Department of State Hospitals, including, but not limited to, conditional release, and specifying the proposed date of release. Notice of the community in which the person is scheduled to reside shall also be given if it is (1) in the county of residence of a witness, victim, or family member of a victim who has requested notification, or (2) within 100 miles of the actual residence of a witness, victim, or family member of a victim who has requested notification. If, after providing the witness, victim, or next of kin with the notice, there is any change in the release date or the community in which the person is to reside, the board or department shall provide the witness, victim, or next of kin with the revised information.

(b) In order to be entitled to receive the notice set forth in this section, the requesting party shall keep the
 department or board informed of his or her current contact information.

(c) The board or department, when sending out notices regarding an offender’s release on parole, shall use the information provided by the requesting party pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 679.03, unless that information is no longer current. If the information is no longer current, the department shall make a reasonable attempt to contact the person and to notify him or her of the impending release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 46.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3058.9.

(a) Whenever any person confined to state prison is serving a term for the conviction of child abuse pursuant to Section 273a, 273ab, 273d, or any sex offense identified in statute as being perpetrated against a minor victim, or as ordered by any court, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, with respect to inmates sentenced pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1168 or pursuant to Section 1170, shall notify the
 sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, having jurisdiction over the community in which the person was convicted and, in addition, the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney having jurisdiction over the community in which the person is scheduled to be released on parole or rereleased following a period of confinement pursuant to a parole revocation without a new commitment.

(b) (1) The notification shall be made by mail at least 45 days prior to the scheduled release date, except as provided in paragraph (3). In all cases, the notification shall include the name of the person who is scheduled to be released, whether or not the person is required to register with local law enforcement, and the community in which the person will reside. The notification shall specify the office within the Department of Corrections with the authority to make final determination and adjustments
 regarding parole location decisions.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Corrections shall not restore credits nor take any administrative action resulting in an inmate being placed in a greater credit earning category that would result in notification being provided less than 45 days prior to an inmate’s scheduled release date.

(3) When notification cannot be provided within the 45 days due to the unanticipated release date change of an inmate as a result of an order from the court, an action by the Board of Parole Hearings, the granting of an administrative appeal, or a finding of not guilty or dismissal of a disciplinary action, that
 affects the sentence of the inmate, or due to a modification of the department’s decision regarding the community into which the person is scheduled to be released pursuant to paragraph (4), the department shall provide notification as soon as practicable, but in no case less than 24 hours after the final decision is made regarding where the parolee will be released.

(4) Those agencies receiving the notice referred to in this subdivision may provide written comment to the board or department regarding the impending release. Agencies that choose to provide written comments shall respond within 30 days prior to the inmate’s scheduled release, unless an agency received less than 45 days’ notice of the impending release, in which case the agency shall respond as soon as practicable prior to the scheduled release. Those comments shall be considered by the board or department, which may, based on those comments, modify its decision regarding the
 community in which the person is scheduled to be released. The Department of Corrections shall respond in writing not less than 15 days prior to the scheduled release with a final determination as to whether to adjust the parole location and documenting the basis for its decision, unless the department received comments less than 30 days prior to the impending release, in which case the department shall respond as soon as practicable prior to the scheduled release. The comments shall become a part of the inmate’s file.

(c) If the court orders the immediate release of an inmate, the department shall notify the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, having jurisdiction over the community in which the person was convicted and, in addition, the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, having jurisdiction over the community in which the person is scheduled to be released on parole or released following
 a period of confinement pursuant to a parole revocation without a new commitment.

(d) The notification required by this section shall be made whether or not a request has been made under Section 3058.5.

In no case shall notice required by this section to the appropriate agency be later than the day of release on parole. If, after the 45-day notice is given to law enforcement and to the district attorney relating to an out-of-county placement, there is change of county placement, notice to the ultimate county of placement shall be made upon the determination of the county of placement.

(e) The notice required by this section shall satisfy the notice required by Section 3058.6 for any person whose offense is identified in both sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 18.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3059.

If any paroled prisoner shall leave the state without permission of his or her supervising parole agency, he or she shall be held as an escaped prisoner and arrested as such.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 44.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3060.1.

Upon the revocation of the parole of any prisoner who was ordered by the court to pay an additional restitution fine pursuant to Section 1202.45, but which was suspended by that section, the additional restitution fine shall be reinstated without the need for any further court proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 313, Sec. 14.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3060.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the parole authority shall revoke the parole of any prisoner who refuses to sign any form required by the Department of Justice stating that the duty of the prisoner to register under Section 290 has been explained to the prisoner, unless the duty to register has not been explained to the prisoner, or refuses to provide samples of blood or saliva as required by the DNA and Forensic
 Identification Data Base and Data Bank Act of 1998 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 295) of Title 9 of Part 1), and shall order the prisoner returned to prison. Confinement pursuant to any single revocation of parole under this section shall not, absent a new conviction and commitment to prison under other provisions of law, exceed six months, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 3057.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 45.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3060.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after January 1, 2001, whenever any paroled person is returned to custody or has his or her parole revoked for conduct described in subdivision (c) of Section 290, the supervising parole agency shall report the circumstances that were the basis for the return to custody or revocation of parole to the law enforcement agency and the district attorney that has primary jurisdiction
 over the community in which the circumstances occurred and to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. Upon the release of the paroled person, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall inform the law enforcement agency and the district attorney that has primary jurisdiction over the community in which the circumstances occurred and, if different, the county in which the person is paroled or discharged, of the circumstances that were the basis for the return to custody or revocation of parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 46.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3060.7.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the supervising parole agency shall notify any person released on parole or postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) of Part 3 who has been classified by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as included within the highest control or risk classification that he or she shall be required to report to his or her assigned parole officer or designated local supervising agency within two days of release from the state prison.

(2) This section shall not prohibit the supervising parole agency or local supervising agency from requiring any person released on parole or postrelease community supervision to report to his or her assigned parole officer within a
 time period that is less than two days from the time of release.

(b) The supervising parole agency, within 24 hours of a parolee’s failure to report as required by this section, shall issue a written order suspending the parole of that parolee, pending a hearing before the Board of Parole Hearings or the court, as applicable, and shall request that a warrant be issued for the parolee’s arrest pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3000.08.

(c) Upon the issuance of an arrest warrant for a parolee who has been classified within the highest control or risk classification, the assigned parole officer shall continue to carry the parolee on his or her regular caseload and shall continue to search for the parolee’s whereabouts.

(d) With regard to any inmate subject to this section, the Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation shall release an inmate sentenced prior to January 1, 1996, one or two days before his or her scheduled release date if the inmate’s release date falls on the day before a holiday or weekend.

(e) With regard to any inmate subject to this section, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall release an inmate one or two days after his or her scheduled release date if the release date falls on the day before a holiday or weekend.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 28.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3060.9.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is hereby authorized to expand the use of parole programs or services to improve the rehabilitation of parolees, reduce recidivism, reduce prison overcrowding, and improve public safety through the following:

(1) The use of intermediate sanctions for offenders who commit a violation of parole.

(2) The use of parole programs or services, in addition to supervision,
 for any offender who is in need of services to reduce the parolee’s likelihood to reoffend.

(b) For purposes of this section, the expansion of parole programs or services may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) Counseling.

(2) Electronic monitoring.

(3) Halfway house services.

(4) Home detention.

(5) Intensive supervision.

(6) Mandatory community service assignments.

(7) Increased drug testing.

(8) Participation
 in one or more components of the Preventing Parolee Crime Program pursuant to Section 3068.

(9) Rehabilitation programs, such as substance abuse treatment.

(10) Restitution.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) “Parole authority” means the Board of Parole Hearings.

(d) The department or the parole authority may assign the programs or services specified in subdivision (b) to offenders who meet the criteria of paragraph (1) or (2). This section shall not alter the existing discretion of the parole authority regarding the reporting by the department of parole
 violations or conditions of parole. In exercising its authority pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (e) and subdivision (f), the parole authority or the department in exercising its authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) may determine an individual parolee’s eligibility for parole programs or services by considering the totality of the circumstances including, but not limited to, the instant violation offense, the history of parole adjustment, current commitment offense, the risk needs assessment of the offender, and prior criminal history, with public safety and offender accountability as primary considerations.
